Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.200

Appeal to director of retirement systems.

Any person feeling aggrieved by any order or determination of a disability board denying disability leave or disability retirement, or canceling a previously granted disability retirement allowance, shall have the right to appeal the order or determination to the director. The director shall have no jurisdiction to entertain the appeal unless a notice of appeal is filed with the director within thirty days following the rendition of the order by the applicable disability board. A copy of the notice of appeal shall be served upon the director and the applicable disability board and, within ninety days thereof, the disability board shall certify its decision and order which shall include findings of fact and conclusions of law, together with a transcript of all proceedings in connection therewith, to the director for review. Upon review of the record, the director may affirm the order of the disability board or may remand the case for such further proceedings as he or she may direct, in accordance with such rules of procedure as the director shall promulgate.

[ 1981 c 294 s 5; 1974 ex.s. c 120 s 6; 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 13; 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 11; 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 16.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 294: See note following RCW 41.26.115.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 120: See note following RCW 41.26.030.

Purpose—Severability—1971 ex.s. c 257: See notes following RCW 41.26.030.